PERRONY pages/p2p.foma
# phoneme to phone

define V    [ a | e | E | ɛ | ø | i | o | u | y | ã | ɛ̃ | ø̃ | õ ] ;

define C    [ p | b | m | f | v | n | t | d | t͡s | d͡z | s | S | l | ʃ | ʒ | t͡ʃ | d͡ʒ | ɲ | j | ʎ | k | g | ŋ | ʁ ]  ;

define WB   [ .#. | " " ] ;

# -------------- CONSONANTS --------------

# 'p' -> /pː/ word-initially SOMETIMES
define initialP     p (->) pː || WB _ ; 

# 'b' -> /bː/ word-initially SOMETIMES
define initialB     b (->) bː || WB _ ; 

# 's' -> /z/ intervocalically
define intervocalS  s -> z || V _ V ;

# 'S' -> /s/ 
define superS            S -> s ;

# 'ʁ' -> /j/ intervocalically
define intervocalR  ʁ -> j || V _ V ;

# 'v' -> /ʋ/ intervocalically SOMETIMES maybe
define intervocalV1 v (->) ʋ || V _ V ;

# 'v' -> /∅/ intervocalically SOMETIMES look into lenition
define intervocalV2 v (->) 0 || V _ V ;

# 'ʁ' -> /ʀ/ word-initially SOMETIMES
define initialR     ʁ (->) ʀ || WB _ ;

# -------------- VOWELS --------------

# 'e' -> /ə/ word-finally 
define finalE       e -> ə || _ WB ;

# 'E' -> /e/
define superE       E -> e ;

# -------------- P2P -----------------

define ExMap [ a v e j -> "EX_avej" || WB _ WB .o. i v i ʁ -> "EX_iviʁ" || WB _ WB .o. p ə -> "EX_pə" || WB _ WB .o. t i t ə -> "EX_titə" || WB _ WB .o. k u t i -> "EX_kuti" || WB _ WB .o. p i d j o -> "EX_pidjo" || WB _ WB .o. k u -> "EX_ku" || WB _ WB .o. p ʁ ə m i -> "EX_pʁəmi" || WB _ WB .o. ʃ y -> "EX_ʃy" || WB _ WB .o. d i -> "EX_di" || WB _ WB .o. d ͡ z i -> "EX_d͡zi" || WB _ WB .o. ʃ o p a t a -> "EX_ʃopata" || WB _ WB .o. ɛ -> "EX_ɛ" || WB _ WB .o. e -> "EX_e" || WB _ WB .o. t s a m o ʃ -> "EX_tsamoʃ" || WB _ WB .o. t r i -> "EX_tri" || WB _ WB .o. ʃ w i -> "EX_ʃwi" || WB _ WB .o. d j ə -> "EX_djə" || WB _ WB .o. v ø ̃ t -> "EX_vø̃t" || WB _ WB .o. t ʁ ɛ n t a -> "EX_tʁɛnta" || WB _ WB .o. k a ʁ ɛ n t a -> "EX_kaʁɛnta" || WB _ WB .o. s ə n k a n t a -> "EX_sənkanta" || WB _ WB .o. ʃ u s a n t a -> "EX_ʃusanta" || WB _ WB .o. s t a n t a -> "EX_stanta" || WB _ WB .o. w i t a n t a -> "EX_witanta" || WB _ WB .o. n o n a n t a -> "EX_nonanta" || WB _ WB .o. m u ʃ t r ə -> "EX_muʃtrə" || WB _ WB .o. p w i -> "EX_pwi" || WB _ WB .o. t i t a -> "EX_tita" || WB _ WB .o. f ʁ i -> "EX_fʁi" || WB _ WB .o. b ʁ e -> "EX_bʁe" || WB _ WB .o. s o v ɛ n -> "EX_sovɛn" || WB _ WB .o. t r a k a s -> "EX_trakas" || WB _ WB ] ;
define ExFix [ "EX_avej" -> a v e j || WB _ WB .o. "EX_iviʁ" -> i v i ʁ || WB _ WB .o. "EX_pə" -> p ə || WB _ WB .o. "EX_titə" -> t i t ə || WB _ WB .o. "EX_kuti" -> k u t i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_pidjo" -> p i d j o || WB _ WB .o. "EX_ku" -> k u || WB _ WB .o. "EX_pʁəmi" -> p ʁ ə m i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_ʃy" -> ʃ y || WB _ WB .o. "EX_di" -> d i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_d͡zi" -> d ͡ z i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_ʃopata" -> ʃ o p a t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_ɛ" -> ɛ || WB _ WB .o. "EX_e" -> e || WB _ WB .o. "EX_tsamoʃ" -> t s a m o ʃ || WB _ WB .o. "EX_tri" -> t r i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_ʃwi" -> ʃ w i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_djə" -> d j ə || WB _ WB .o. "EX_vø̃t" -> v ø ̃ t || WB _ WB .o. "EX_tʁɛnta" -> t ʁ ɛ n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_kaʁɛnta" -> k a ʁ ɛ n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_sənkanta" -> s ə n k a n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_ʃusanta" -> ʃ u s a n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_stanta" -> s t a n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_witanta" -> w i t a n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_nonanta" -> n o n a n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_muʃtrə" -> m u ʃ t r ə || WB _ WB .o. "EX_pwi" -> p w i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_tita" -> t i t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_fʁi" -> f ʁ i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_bʁe" -> b ʁ e || WB _ WB .o. "EX_sovɛn" -> s o v ɛ n || WB _ WB .o. "EX_trakas" -> t r a k a s || WB _ WB ] ;

define P2P ExMap .o. initialP .o. initialB .o. intervocalS .o. superS .o. intervocalR .o. intervocalV1 .o. intervocalV2 .o. initialR .o. finalE .o. superE .o. ExFix ;

regex P2P;
